Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB536.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 338 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "emergency action plan":
(a) Has the same meaning as in 29 C.F.R. sec. 1910.38; and
(b) Means the procedures and rules to follow in the event of fire, natural
disaster, or other threatening situation that may pose a health or safety
hazard to the employees in the workplace.
(2) (a) Each employer shall create an emergency action plan. The plan shall be
written, kept in the workplace, and available for employees for review.
(b) For employers with ten (10) or fewer employees, the emergency action plan
does not need to be written and may be communicated orally to employees.
(3) An emergency action plan shall include at a minimum:
(a) Procedures for employees to report a fire or other emergency;
(b) Procedures for emergency evacuation, including the type of evacuation and
exit route assignments;
(c) Procedures to be followed by employees who remain at the workplace to
operate critical plant operations before evacuating;
(d) Procedures to account for all employees after an evacuation;
(e) Procedures to be followed by employees who perform rescue or medical
duties; and
(f) The name or job title of every employee who may be contacted by an
employee who needs more information about the plan or an explanation of
his or her duties under the plan.
(4) Each employer shall establish and maintain an employee alarm system. The
employee alarm system shall have a distinctive signal for each purpose and
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1260
comply with the requirements of 29 C.F.R. sec. 1910.165.
(5) Each employer shall designate and train employees to assist in the safe and
orderly evacuation of other employees.
(6) Each employer shall review the emergency action plan with each employee
covered by the plan when the:
(a) Plan is developed or the employee is assigned initially to a job;
(b) Employee's responsibilities under the plan change; or
(c) Plan is changed.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/4/2025 11:49 AM Jacketed